Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-114
Directors; assumption of office; tenure.

The director elected shall assume the duties of his office the first Tuesday in March after his election; Provided, all incumbents shall hold their respective offices until their successors are elected and qualified, as provided in section 46-112.

Laws 1905, c. 166, § 1, p. 650;

Laws 1913, c. 142, § 2, p. 345;

R.S.1913, § 3460;

Laws 1915, c. 69, § 1, p. 172;

C.S.1922, § 2860;

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 1, p. 246;

C.S.1929, § 46-104;

Laws 1935, c. 106, § 1, p. 342;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-104;

R.S.1943, § 46-114.